en: dehydrated seaweed
de: Seetang getrocknet
es: alga marina deshidritada
fi: kuivattu merilevä
fr: algues déshydratées
hr: dehidrirana morska trava
it: alghe disidratate

en: algae extract
de: Algenextrakt
es: extracto de alga, extracto de algas
fr: extrait d'algues
hr: ekstrakt algi
it: estratto d'alghe, estratto d'alga, estratto di alghe, estratto di alga
ja: 緑藻エキス
nl: algenextract

en: seaweed extract
de: Seealgenextrakt
fi: merileväuute
fr: extrait d'algues marines
hr: ekstrakt morske trave
it: estratto di alghe marine
sv: tångextrakt

en: Lithothamnium calcareum
de: Rotalge (Lithothamnium calcareum)
es: lithothamnium calcareum, algas calcáreas
fr: algue lithothamnium calcareum, algue marine lithothamnium calcareum
hr: lithothamnium calcareum
it: Lithothamnium calcareum
la: Lithothamnium calcareum
nl: Lithothamnium calcareum

en: dulse
ar: الدلسي
da: Søl
de: Lappentang
es: Dulse
fi: herkkupunakämmen
fr: dulse
ga: Duileasc
gd: Duileasg
hr: dulse
hu: Vörös pálmamoszat
is: Söl
it: Dulse
ja: ダルス
nl: Dulse
nn: Søl
pl: algi morskie dulse, dulse

en: Palmaria palmata
de: Lappentang (Palmaria palmata)
es: Palmaria palmata, duse, dillisk
fr: Palmaria palmata
hr: palmaria palmata
it: palmaria palmata
la: Palmaria palmata

en: Fucus
ar: فوقس
be: Фукус
da: Blæretang-slægten
de: Tang
es: fucus
fr: fucus
hr: fukus
it: fucus
ja: ヒバマタ属
ko: 푸쿠스
la: Fucus
pl: morszczyn
ru: Фукус
sq: Fukusi
uk: Фукус

en: glasswort, marsh samphire
cy: senpeder
de: Queller
es: Salicornia
fr: salicorne
ga: Lus na gloine
hr: staklenka
it: salicornia
la: salicornia europaea
nl: zeekraal

en: Fresh glasswort, Fresh salicornia
fr: Salicorne fraîche, Salicornia fraîche
hr: svježi staklenik
it: salicornia fresca
nl: verse zeekraal

en: tsunomata
ja: 角叉, つのまた

en: laver
de: Laver
la: Porphyra

en: nori, nori seaweed
ar: نوري
az: Nori
bn: নরি
ca: Nori
cs: nori
da: nori
de: Nori, Nabel-Purpurtang
el: νόρι
eo: norio
es: nori, alga nori
et: nori
eu: Nori
fa: نوری
fi: nori
fr: Nori, algue Yaki Nori
gd: Nori
gl: Nori
he: נורי
hr: niti ja
hu: nori
id: Nori
it: Nori
ja: 海苔, のり
jv: Nori
ka: ნორი
ky: Нори
la: Porphyra umbilicalis, porphyra umbilical
mk: нори
ms: Nori
nb: nori
ne: नोरी
nl: nori
nn: nori
pa: ਨੋਰੀ
pl: nori
pt: nori
ru: нори
sh: Nori
sq: nori
sr: Нори
sv: nori
tr: Nori
uk: Норі
ur: نوری
vi: Nori
zh: 海苔

en: sea lettuce, green laver
xx: ulva, ulvales, Ульва
ar: أولفاويات
ca: ulvals
fa: دریاکاهوسانان
ja: アオサ
ka: ულვა
ko: 갈파래목
la: Ulva sp.
uk: Ульвальні
zh: 石莼目

en: broadleaf sea lettuce
ar: أولفا خسية
az: Ulva yosunu
ca: enciam de mar
cs: porost locikový
da: Havsalat
de: Meersalat
es: lechuga de mar
eu: Itsas uraza
fa: کاهوی دریایی
fi: merisalaatti, Suolilevät
fr: laitue de mer, laitue de mers
ga: Glasán
gd: Glasag
gl: Leituga de mar
hr: morska salata
hu: tengeri saláta
is: Maríusvunta
it: lattuga di mare
ko: 갈파래속
la: ulva lactuca
mk: морска марула
nl: zeesla
pl: Ulwa sałatowa
pt: Alface-do-mar
sv: Havssallat
uk: Морський салат
zh: 石莼, 石莼属

en: thongweed, sea spaghetti
ca: espagueti de mar
de: Riementang
fi: merispagetti
fr: spaghetti de mer, Hymanthalia, haricot de mer, haricots de mer
ga: Reamóra
gd: Iomlach
gl: Cinta
hr: prašnjak
it: thongweed
la: Himanthalia elongata, Himanthalia elongato
nl: riemwier

en: Ascophyllum
de: Knotentang
fr: Ascophyllum
hr: ascophyllum
it: ascophyllum
la: Ascophyllum

en: kelp
bg: келп
fr: varech
hr: kelp
it: kelp
la: Laminariales
sv: kelp

en: kombu
xx: kombu
az: yapon laminariyası
de: Kombu
es: kombu, alga kombu
fa: کونبو
fi: kombu, kombu-merilevä
fr: kombu, konbu
hy: կոմբու
it: alga kombu
ja: コンブ, 昆布, こんぶ
ru: комбу
sk: konbu
th: คมบุ

en: tangle, oarweed
fr: kombu breton

en: Sea belt
fr: Kombu royal
it: cintura marina